test/src/morphology/N-сестра_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - сестра M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: сестра́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: сестру́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: сестры́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: сестре́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: сестре́
      сестра+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: сестро́й
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: сёстры
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Anim: сестёр
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: сестёр
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: сёстрах
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: сёстрам
      сестра+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: сёстрами
